Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.11.040

Intergovernmental cooperation and action.

The legislative body of a code city may exercise any of its powers or perform any of its functions including purchasing, and participate in the financing thereof, jointly or in cooperation, as provided for in chapter 39.34 RCW. The legislative body of a code city shall have power to accept any gift or grant for any public purpose and may carry out any conditions of such gift or grant when not in conflict with state or federal law.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 17; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.11.040.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.